Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1515.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2300 of Title 6, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Discriminate in the provision of financial services” means


to utilize a social credit score to directly or indirectly decline

Req. No. 2344 Page 1


to provide full and equal enjoyment in the provision of financial


services, including the refusal to provide, termination of, or


restriction of financial services;


2. “Financial institution” means a bank having total assets of


more than One Hundred Billion Dollars ($100,000,000,000.00) or a


payment processor, credit card company, credit card network, payment


network, payment service provider, or payment gateway that has


processed more than One Hundred Billion Dollars


($100,000,000,000.00) in transactions in the last calendar year. A


financial institution shall include any affiliate or subsidiary


company, and the assets and the amount of transactions processed by


such affiliate or subsidiary;


3. “Financial service” means any financial product or service


offered by a financial institution;


4. “Person” means any individual, partnership, association,


joint stock company, trust, corporation, nonprofit organization, or


other business or legal entity;


5. “Protected from government interference” means a reference


to any speech, religious exercise, association, expression, or


conduct that is protected by the First Amendment to the United


States Constitution other than activities that the Supreme Court of


the United States has expressly held are unprotected as of the


effective date of this act, including obscenity, fraud, incitement,


true threats, fighting words, or defamation; and

Req. No. 2344 Page 2


6. a. “Social credit score” means any analysis, rating,


scoring, list, or tabulation that evaluates the


following:


(1) the exercise of religion that is protected from


government interference by the First Amendment to


the United States Constitution, Section 2 of


Article I of the Oklahoma Constitution, or


federal or state law, including all aspects of


religious observance and practices, beliefs, and


affiliations,


(2) any speech, expression, or association that is


protected from government interference by the


First Amendment to the United States Constitution


or federal or state law, including opinions,


speech, or other expressive activities, including


the lawful preservation of privacy regarding


those activities, including the refusal to


disclose lobbying, political activity, or


contributions beyond what is required by


applicable state and federal law,


(3) failure or refusal to adopt any targets or


disclosures related to greenhouse gas emissions


beyond what is required by applicable state and


federal law,

Req. No. 2344 Page 3


(4) failure or refusal to conduct any type of racial,


diversity, or gender audit or disclosure or to


provide any sort of quota, preference, or benefit


based, in whole or in part, on race, diversity,


or gender,


(5) failure or refusal to facilitate or assist


employees in obtaining abortions or gender


reassignment services, or


(6) except as otherwise provided by law,


participation in the following lawful business


associations or business activities:


(a) with an entity that engages in the


manufacture, distribution, wholesale,


supply, or retail sale of firearms, firearms


accessories, or ammunition,


(b) with an entity that engages in the


exploration, production, utilization,


transportation, sale, or manufacture of


fossil fuel or fossil fuel-based energy, or


(c) agriculture, and


b. For the purpose of division 6 of subparagraph a of


this paragraph, social credit score shall not include


the financial institution evaluating quantifiable


risks of a person based on impartial, financial risk-

Req. No. 2344 Page 4


based standards that include activities described in


division 6 of subparagraph a of this paragraph, if the


standards are established in advance by the financial


institution and publicly disclosed to customers and


potential customers.


Terms defined in this subsection shall be construed in favor of


the broad protection of the conduct, opinions, and beliefs protected


by the First Amendment to the United States Constitution, applicable


federal law, the Oklahoma Constitution, and state law.


B. If a financial institution refuses to provide, restricts, or


terminates service to a customer, the customer may request a


statement of specific reasons within ninety (90) days after


receiving notice of the refusal to provide, restriction of, or


termination of service. The customer may request the statement from


a customer service representative or designated account


representative by phone, mail, or electronic mail. Unless


prohibited by law, the financial institution shall transmit the


statement of specific reasons via mail and electronic mail within


fourteen (14) days of receipt of the request. The statement of


specific reasons shall include:


1. A detailed explanation of the basis for the denial,


restriction, or termination of service, including a description of


any of the speech, religious exercise, business activity of the



Req. No. 2344 Page 5


consumer with a particular industry, or other conduct that was, in


whole or in part, the basis of the denial or termination of service;


2. A copy of the terms of service agreed to by the customer and


the financial institution; and


3. A citation to the specific provisions of the terms of


service upon which the financial institution relied to refuse to


provide, restrict, or terminate service, if relevant.


C. A financial institution shall not:


1. Discriminate in the provision of financial services to a


person; or


2. Agree, conspire, or coordinate, directly or indirectly,


including through any intermediary or third party, with another


person or group of persons to engage in activity prohibited by


paragraph 1 of this subsection.


D. Any violation of this section shall be considered a


violation of the Oklahoma Consumer Protection Act, Section 751 et


seq. of Title 15 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


E. If the Attorney General has reasonable cause to believe that


any financial institution has engaged in or is engaging in any


violation of this section, the Attorney General may investigate,


bring civil action, and seek remedies as provided in the Oklahoma


Consumer Protection Act.


F. Any person harmed by a violation of this section may


initiate a civil action for either or both of the following:

Req. No. 2344 Page 6


1. Actual damages or Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00),


whichever is greater, for each violation. If the trier of fact


finds that the violation was willful, damages may increase to an


amount not to exceed three times the actual damages sustained or


Thirty Thousand Dollars ($30,000.00), whichever is greater. A court


shall award a prevailing plaintiff reasonable attorney fees and


court costs; or


2. Preventative relief, including an application for a


permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or other order


as necessary to enforce the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 15 O.S. 2021, Section 753, as last


amended by Section 346, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (15 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 753), is amended to read as follows:


Section 753. A person engages in a practice which that is


declared to be unlawful and deemed a Class D1 felony offense under


the Oklahoma Consumer Protection Act when, in the course of the


person’s business, the person:


1. Represents, knowingly or with reason to know, that the


subject of a consumer transaction is of a particular make or brand,


when it is of another;


2. Makes a false or misleading representation, knowingly or


with reason to know, as to the source, sponsorship, approval, or


certification of the subject of a consumer transaction;



Req. No. 2344 Page 7


3. Makes a false or misleading representation, knowingly or


with reason to know, as to affiliation, connection, association


with, or certification by another;


4. Makes a false or misleading representation or designation,


knowingly or with reason to know, of the geographic origin of the


subject of a consumer transaction;


5. Makes a false representation, knowingly or with reason to


know, as to the characteristics, ingredients, uses, benefits,


alterations, or quantities of the subject of a consumer transaction


or a false representation as to the sponsorship, approval, status,


affiliation, or connection of a person therewith;


6. Knowingly or with reason to know, makes a false or


misleading representation or gives the false or misleading


impression of being affiliated with a state agency or an affiliate


of a state agency through advertisement or publication;


7. Represents, knowingly or with reason to know, that the


subject of a consumer transaction is original or new if the person


knows that it is reconditioned, reclaimed, used, or secondhand;


8. Represents, knowingly or with reason to know, that the


subject of a consumer transaction is of a particular standard,


style, or model, if it is of another;


9. Advertises, knowingly or with reason to know, the subject of


a consumer transaction with intent not to sell it as advertised;



Req. No. 2344 Page 8


10. Advertises, knowingly or with reason to know, the subject


of a consumer transaction with intent not to supply reasonably


expected public demand, unless the advertisement discloses a


limitation of quantity;


11. Advertises under the guise of obtaining sales personnel


when in fact the purpose is to sell the subject of a consumer


transaction to the sales personnel applicants;


12. Makes false or misleading statements of fact, knowingly or


with reason to know, concerning the price of the subject of a


consumer transaction or the reason for, existence of, or amounts of


price reduction;


13. Employs “bait bait and switch” switch advertising, which


consists of an offer to sell the subject of a consumer transaction


which the seller does not intend to sell, which advertising is


accompanied by one or more of the following practices:


a. refusal to show the subject of a consumer transaction


advertised,


b. disparagement of the advertised subject of a consumer


transaction or the terms of sale,


c. requiring undisclosed tie-in sales or other


undisclosed conditions to be met prior to selling the


advertised subject of a consumer transaction,





Req. No. 2344 Page 9


d. refusal to take orders for the subject of a consumer


transaction advertised for delivery within a


reasonable time,


e. showing or demonstrating defective subject of a


consumer transaction which that the seller knows is


unusable or impracticable for the purpose set forth in


the advertisement,


f. accepting a deposit for the subject of a consumer


transaction and subsequently charging the buyer for a


higher priced item, or


g. willful failure to make deliveries of the subject of a


consumer transaction within a reasonable time or to


make a refund therefor upon the request of the


purchaser;


14. Conducts a closing out sale without having first obtained a


license as required in the Oklahoma Consumer Protection Act;


15. Resumes the business for which the closing out sale was


conducted within thirty-six (36) months from the expiration date of


the closing out sale license;


16. Falsely states, knowingly or with reason to know, that


services, replacements, or repairs are needed;


17. Violates any provision of the Oklahoma Health Spa Act;


18. Violates any provision of the Home Repair Fraud Act;



Req. No. 2344 Page 10


19. Violates any provision of the Consumer Consumers Disclosure


of Prizes and Gifts Act;


20. Violates any provision of Section 755.1 of this title or


Section 1847a of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


21. Commits an unfair or deceptive trade practice as defined in


Section 752 of this title;


22. Violates any provision of Section 169.1 7111 of Title 8 36


of the Oklahoma Statutes in fraudulently or intentionally failing or


refusing to honor the contract to provide certain cemetery services


specified in the contract entered into pursuant to the Perpetual


Care Fund Act;


23. Misrepresents a mail solicitation as an invoice or as a


billing statement;


24. Offers to purchase a mineral or royalty interest through an


offer that resembles an oil and gas lease and that the consumer


believed was an oil and gas lease;


25. Refuses to honor gift certificates, warranties, or any


other merchandise offered by a person in a consumer transaction


executed prior to the closing of the business of the person without


providing a purchaser a means of redeeming such merchandise or


ensuring the warranties offered will be honored by another person;


26. Knowingly causes a charge to be made by any billing method


to a consumer for services which the person knows was not authorized


in advance by the consumer;

Req. No. 2344 Page 11


27. Knowingly causes a charge to be made by any billing method


to a consumer for a product or products which the person knows was


not authorized in advance by the consumer;


28. Violates Section 752A of this title;


29. Makes deceptive use of another’s name in notification or


solicitation, as defined in Section 752 of this title;


30. Falsely states or implies that any person, product, or


service is recommended or endorsed by a named third person;


31. Falsely states that information about the consumer,


including, but not limited to, the name, address, or phone number of


the consumer has been provided by a third person, whether that


person is named or unnamed;


32. Acting as a debt collector, contacts a debtor and threatens


to file a suit against the debtor over a debt barred by the statute


of limitations which that has passed for filing suit for such debt;


or


33. Acting as a debt collector, contacts a debtor and uses


obscene or profane language to collect a debt; or


34. Any violation of the provisions of Section 1 of this act.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2344 CAD 1/11/2026 1:49:42 PM





Req. No. 2344 Page 12